Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 3. Representation.

§ 60.2-122.
Limitation of fees.

No individual claiming benefits shall be charged fees of any kind in any proceeding under this title by the Commission or its representatives. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall, for each such offense, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-107; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-124; 1981, c. 249; 1986, c. 480.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Costs, § 3.

§ 60.2-123.
Representation.

Any individual or employing unit appearing before an officer of the Commission may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent. However, no such counsel or agent representing a claimant shall either charge or receive for such services more than an amount approved by the Commission.

History.

1981, c. 249, § 60.1-124.1; 1986, c. 480.